Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,128
Automobile liability policy; insurance carrier; surcharge prohibited.

When any person insured under an automobile liability policy is involved in an accident in which the license of the operator of another motor vehicle is suspended pursuant to section 60-507 because the operator failed to provide proof of financial responsibility and there is a reasonable possibility of judgment being rendered against such operator, the insurance carrier covering the insured person shall not surcharge any of the automobile coverages in the insured party's current policy or any subsequent renewal policy for any loss which was sustained in such accident by the insured person and covered under such person's automobile liability policy.

Laws 1985, LB 404, § 4.